Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2910
Mobilization or manual therapy, defined.

Mobilization or manual therapy means a group of techniques comprising a continuum of skilled passive movements to the joints or related soft tissues, or both, throughout the normal physiological range of motion that are applied at varying speeds and amplitudes, without limitation.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 128;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,372;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1003.